Utah statutes.
73-5a-401.   Records and reports.

The state engineer may make rules requiring the owner of any dam to:

(1)  maintain records pertaining to the construction, operation, or maintenance of the dam; or

(2)  submit:

(a)  reports to the state engineer regarding maintenance, operation, or instrumentation readings; or

(b)  any other data considered necessary by the state engineer.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 1990 General Session

